Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
PART 1 General Provisions

29-2-1.
Categories of guardians for minors.

Guardians of minors may be categorized as follows:

Natural guardians;

Testamentary guardians;

Temporary guardians;

Standby guardians; and

Permanent guardians.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

Cross references.

Service of process on guardian of incapacitated adult, § 9-11-4(l)(4).

Law reviews.

For survey article citing developments in Georgia juvenile court practice and procedure from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 167 (1981).

29-2-2.
Qualified individuals to serve as guardian of minor.

Only an individual may serve as guardian of a minor.

No individual may be appointed as guardian of a minor who:

Is a minor, a ward, or a protected person; or

Has a conflict of interest with the minor unless the court determines that the conflict of interest is insubstantial or that the appointment would be in the minor’s best interest.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.